Utah statutes.
41-22-29.   Operation by persons under eight years of age prohibited -- Definitions -- Exception -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Organized practice" means a scheduled motorcycle practice held in an off-road vehicle facility designated by the division and conducted by an organization carrying liability insurance in at least the amounts specified by the division under Subsection (5) covering all activities associated with the practice.

(b)  "Sanctioned race" means a motorcycle race conducted on a closed course and sponsored and sanctioned by an organization carrying liability insurance in at least the amounts specified by the division under Subsection (5) covering all activities associated with the race.

(2)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), a person under eight years of age may not operate and an owner may not give another person who is under eight years of age permission to operate an off-highway vehicle on any public land, trail, street, or highway of this state.

(3)  A child under eight years of age may participate in a sanctioned race or organized practice if:

(a)  the child is under the immediate supervision of an adult;

(b)  emergency medical service personnel, as defined in Section 26-8a-102, are on the premises and immediately available to provide assistance at all times during the sanctioned race or organized practice; and

(c)  an ambulance provider, as defined in Section 26-8a-102, is on the premises and immediately available to provide assistance for a sanctioned race.

(4)  Any person convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of an infraction and shall be fined not more than $50 per offense.

(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules specifying the minimum amounts of liability coverage for an organized practice or sanctioned race.

